Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3822
(UTC 301) Representation; basic effect.

(UTC 301) (a) Notice to a person who may represent and bind another person under sections 30-3822 to 30-3826 has the same effect as if notice were given directly to the other person.

(b) The consent of a person who may represent and bind another person under sections 30-3822 to 30-3826 is binding on the person represented unless the person represented objects to the representation before the consent would otherwise have become effective.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in sections 30-3837 and 30-3854, a person who under sections 30-3822 to 30-3826 may represent a settlor who lacks capacity may receive notice and give a binding consent on the settlor's behalf.

(d) A settlor may not represent and bind a beneficiary under sections 30-3822 to 30-3826 with respect to the termination or modification of a trust under subsection (a) of section 30-3837.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 22;

Laws 2005, LB 533, § 39.